Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-203
Property tax; levy; amount.

A city of the first class may levy taxes for general revenue purposes in any one year, not exceeding forty-two cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in the limits of such city. This section shall not be construed so as to affect the limitation on maximum annual levies for all municipal purposes in the city in any one year as set forth in section 16-702.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, I, p. 245;

Laws 1901, c. 19, § 3, p. 307;

R.S.1913, § 4819;

C.S.1922, § 3987;

C.S.1929, § 16-204;

Laws 1937, c. 28, § 1, p. 150;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-204;

R.S.1943, § 16-203;

Laws 1945, c. 20, § 1, p. 127;

Laws 1947, c. 29, § 1, p. 136;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 7, p. 933;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 38;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 41.

In absence of a limitation in the act granting it authority to issue bonds, the city has power to levy sufficient taxes to pay the same, and a judgment against the city for the amount of the bonds, puts the question of authority to levy the tax to pay such bonds to rest, and mandamus will enforce such levy. United States ex rel. Masslich v. Saunders, 124 F. 124 (8th Cir. 1903).